Utah statutes.
16-10a-904.   Advance of expenses for directors.
(1)  A corporation may pay for or reimburse the reasonable expenses incurred
by a director who is a party to a proceeding in advance of final disposition
of the proceeding if:
(a)  the director furnishes the corporation a written affirmation of his good
faith belief that he has met the applicable standard of conduct described in
Section 16-10a-902;
(b)  the director furnishes to the corporation a written undertaking, executed
personally or on his behalf, to repay the advance if it is ultimately
determined that he did not meet the standard of conduct; and
(c)  a determination is made that the facts then known to those making the
determination would not preclude indemnification under this part.
(2)  The undertaking required by Subsection (1)(b) must be an unlimited
general obligation of the director but need not be secured and may be accepted
without reference to financial ability to make repayment.
(3)  Determinations and authorizations of payments under this section shall be
made in the manner specified in Section 16-10a-906.
